Utah statutes.
41-6a-507.   Supervised probation for certain driving under the influence violations.

(1)  If supervised probation is ordered under Section 41-6a-505 or 41-6a-517:

(a)  the court shall specify the period of the probation;

(b)  the person shall pay all of the costs of the probation; and

(c)  the court may order any other conditions of the probation.

(2)  The court shall provide the probation described in this section by contract with a probation monitoring agency or a private probation provider.

(3)  The probation provider described in Subsection (2) shall monitor the person's compliance with all conditions of the person's sentence, conditions of probation, and court orders received under this part and shall notify the court of any failure to comply with or complete that sentence or those conditions or orders.

(4) (a)  The court may waive all or part of the costs associated with probation if the person is determined to be indigent by the court.

(b)  The probation provider described in Subsection (2) shall cover the costs of waivers by the court under Subsection (4)(a).



Enacted by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

